Illinois, session 104th, SB3243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-5025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-5025)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-5025)7    Sec. 3-5025. Books. Every recorder shall keep the 8following books or computer databases:9        1. An entry book, in which the recorder shall, 10    immediately on the receipt of any instrument to be 11    recorded or filed, enter, in the order of its reception, 12    the names of the parties thereto, its date, the day of the 13    month, hour and year of receiving the same, and a brief 14    description of the premises, indorsing upon each 15    instrument a number corresponding with the number of such 16    entry.17        2. A grantor's index, in which shall be entered the 18    name of each grantor, in alphabetical order, the name of 19    the grantee, date of the instrument, time of receipt, kind 20    of instrument, consideration, the book and page in which 21    it is recorded, or the number under which it is filed, and 22    a brief description of the premises.23        3. A grantee's index, in which shall be entered the   SB3243- 2 -LRB104 18674 RTM 32117 b1    name of each grantee, in alphabetical order, the name of 2    the grantor, date of the instrument, time of receipt, kind 3    of instrument, consideration, the book and page in which 4    it is recorded, or the number under which it is filed, and 5    a brief description of the premises.6        4. An index to each book or computer database of 7    record, in which shall be entered, in alphabetical order, 8    the name of each grantor and grantee, and the page number 9    in which or reference number to which the instrument is 10    recorded.11        5. When required by the county board, an abstract 12    book, which shall show by tracts every conveyance or 13    incumbrance recorded, the date of the instrument, time of 14    filing the same, the book and page where the same is 15    recorded; which book shall be so kept as to show a true 16    chain of title to each tract and the incumbrances thereon, 17    as shown by the records of the office.18        6. An index to recorded maps, plats and subdivisions, 19    such index to be made by description of land mapped, or 20    subdivided by range, township, Section, quarter-section, 21    etc.22        7. An index showing in alphabetical order the names of 23    the parties against whom judgments have been rendered or 24    made and transcripts or memoranda of such judgments have 25    been recorded, and the parties named in notices recorded 26    pursuant to Section 1 of "An Act concerning constructive   SB3243- 3 -LRB104 18674 RTM 32117 b1    notice of condemnation proceedings, proceedings to sell 2    real property of decedents to pay debts, or other suits 3    seeking equitable relief involving real property, and 4    proceedings in bankruptcy" approved June 11, 1917, as 5    amended.6        8. An index of all ordinances, petitions, assessment 7    rolls, orders, judgments or other documents filed or 8    recorded in respect of any drainage or special assessment 9    matter sufficient to enable the public to identify all 10    tracts involved therein and to locate all the documents 11    which have been filed or recorded. The recorder may 12    solicit the assistance of the State Records Commission in 13    organizing and indexing these documents.14    Any recorder may publish property assessment lists in a 15newspaper of general circulation in the county or on the 16county's public-facing website. 17    Any recorder may install or contract for the use of a 18computerized system that will permit automated entry and 19indexing, alphabetically by document, of instruments filed in 20the office and that will provide both quick search and 21retrieval of such entries and hard copy print output, whether 22on paper, optical disk media, or microfilm, of such entries as 23indexed. If such a computerized system has been in use in the 24office for at least 6 months and the recorder determines that 25it provides accurate and reliable indices that may be stored 26as permanent records, more quickly and efficiently than the   SB3243- 4 -LRB104 18674 RTM 32117 b1system previously used, the recorder may thereafter 2discontinue the use of the manual system and use only the 3computerized system for such indices. In that event, 4references in this Division to books, records or forms as 5relate to such indices are intended to encompass and refer to 6the computer system and all materials and forms directly 7related to that system and its proper use.8    This Section is subject to the Local Records Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-400, eff. 1-1-24.)